Utah statutes.
26-4-25.   Burial of unclaimed body -- Request by college of medicine.
Counties shall provide decent burial for a body found in the county which is
unclaimed, unless it is requested by the college of medicine of the University
of Utah and the burial requirement in Subsection 26-4-27(2) does not apply
because the identity of the body is known. Services rendered by a funeral
director shall be paid for by the county.
